Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 6. Foreign Corporations

§ 851.
Service on Secretary of State.

When a foreign corporation has appointed the Secretary of State as its process agent pursuant to the statutes relating to such corporations, service of process made upon the Secretary by delivering to him or her duplicate copies thereof, shall be sufficient. A copy of the stipulation, filed under the provisions of

11 V.S.A. § 3011

, 11A V.S.A. § 15.10, and 11B V.S.A. § 15.10, certified by the Secretary, with his or her certificate that process has been served on him or her, shall be sufficient evidence thereof.

§ 852.
Fees; mailing of copy to corporation.

When process is served on the Secretary of State under the provisions of section 851 of this title, there shall be paid to him or her by the officer at the time of such service the sum of $5.00.
The Secretary shall forthwith forward by mail prepaid one of the duplicate copies to the corporation at its home office or to a person whom it designates.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 37

, § 6;

1967, No. 278

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. July 1, 1968.

§ 853.
Doing business by particular companies without designating process agent; penalty.

A person or agent for a foreign insurance, express, shipping car, telephone or telegraph company, or other foreign company doing like business, which has not designated the Secretary of State as its process agent, as required by

11 V.S.A. § 692

who solicits or receives a risk or application for insurance, or receives money or value for such insurance by such company, or receives money or value for the transportation of a package or property by such express or shipping car company, or for the transmission of a message or dispatch by such telegraph company, or receives money, rent, royalty, or income for such telephone company for the use of its instruments or lines or for the sending of any message, shall be fined not more than $500.00 nor less than $100.00.

§ 854.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 855.
Doing business as appointment of process agent.

If the contact with the State or the activity in the state of a foreign corporation, or the contact or activity imputable to it, is sufficient to support a Vermont personal judgment against it, the contact or activity shall be deemed to be doing business in Vermont by that foreign corporation and shall be equivalent to the appointment by it of the Secretary of the State of Vermont and his or her successors to be its true and lawful attorney upon whom may be served all lawful process in any action or proceedings against it arising or growing out of that contact or activity, and also shall be deemed to be its agreement that any process against it which is so served upon the Secretary of State shall be of the same legal force and effect as if served on the foreign corporation at its principal place of business in the state or country where it is incorporated according to the law of that state or country.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 353

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 1968;

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 43, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 856.
Service of process.

Service of process by virtue of section 855 of this title shall be made by delivering to the Secretary of State duplicate copies of the process, with the officer’s return of service thereon, and a fee of $25.00, to be taxed in the plaintiff’s costs if he or she prevails. The Secretary shall forthwith forward one of the duplicate copies by registered mail prepaid to the corporation at its principal place of business in the state or country where it is incorporated, which principal place of business shall be stated in the process. The service shall be sufficient if a copy of the process, with the officer’s return thereon showing the service upon the Secretary of State, is sent by the plaintiff to the foreign corporation by registered mail, and if the plaintiff’s affidavit of compliance herewith is filed with the process in court. The Secretary shall file one of the copies and endorse upon each copy the day and hour of service.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 37

, § 7;

1967, No. 278

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. July 1, 1968;

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 44, eff. March 29, 1972;

2013, No. 72

, § 11.

§ 857.
Continuance; costs.

The court in which the action is pending may order such continuances as may be necessary to afford the defendant reasonable opportunity to appear and defend.
The fee provided in section 856 of this title shall be taxed in the plaintiff’s costs if he or she prevails.

§ 858.
Alternative means of service.

As an alternative to service of process under this subchapter or when a stipulation appointing the Secretary of State as process agent is not filed with the Commissioner of Foreign Corporations, process may be served upon a foreign corporation in accordance with sections 912 and 913 of this title or by any method that the Supreme Court shall by rule provide for service upon a domestic corporation.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 234, eff. March 29, 1972.